District of Columbia statutes.
31-5103

Forms authorized to be issued.

Credit life insurance and credit accident and health insurance shall be issued only in the following forms:

(1)

Individual policies of life insurance issued to debtors on the term plan;

(2)

Individual policies of accident and health insurance issued to debtors on a term plan or disability provisions in individual life policies to provide such coverage;

(3)

Group policies of life insurance issued to creditors providing insurance upon the lives of debtors on the term plan; and

(4)

Group policies of accident and health insurance issued to creditors on a term plan insuring debtors or disability provisions in group life policies to provide such coverage.

Sept. 25, 1962, 76 Stat. 581, Pub. L. 87-686, § 3

History

1981 Ed., § 35-1003.
1973 Ed., § 35-1603.

Prior Codifications